src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NMN_NEÄVˈV
!! Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_long
! gradation: yes
!! Is for nouns with ''-ast'' Loc
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! !!1.2.2.0 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.0.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.0.2.0 Lack Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.0.2.0[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! ** Yaml: __N-neavvv__
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			!!= * @CODE@  neävˈv
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			!!= * @CODE@  neävˈv
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

:%^CCC2CC A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@  neävv
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;			!!= * @CODE@  niâvˈvu
!! Sg_Ill

: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) neävˈv
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

:%>a ESS/PAR ;   	       			!!= * @CODE@ neävˈvan

+Der/Dimin:%^VOWRaise%^CCC2CC%> N_PIISSUŽ ;  !!= * @CODE@ niâvvuž
+Der/Dimin:%^CCC2CC%> N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: neävvaž

:%^CCC2CC A-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) neävv» CHECKME
!! Sg_Loc_Px..


LEXICON N_NEÄVˈV-PL
+N: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;                   !!= * @CODE@  neävˈv
+N:%^CCC2CC PL-NOM ;       !!= * @CODE@  neävv
+N:%^CCC2CC%>a PL-OBL ;                   !!= * @CODE@ neävvai


LEXICON N_PEÄLDD !!= * @CODE@ peäldd:peäldd
+N: NMN_PEÄLDD ;
LEXICON NMN_PEÄLDD
!! Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_xyy
! gradation: yes
!! Is for nouns with ''-ast'' Loc
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! !!1.2.2.0 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.0.2 Has Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.0.2.0 Lack Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.0.2.0[] (Diphthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! !!(9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: piâlduž (2009: 310)
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! N_A-URaise3-32
!! similar_to: N_JEÄʹRMM
!! ** Yaml: __N-pealdd__
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		!!= * @CODE@  peäldd
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    		!!= * @CODE@  peäldd
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

:%^XYY2XY A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@  peäld
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@  piâlddu
!! Sg_Ill

: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;           !!= * @CODE@ (5) peäldd
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

:%>a ESS/PAR ;   	       		!!= * @CODE@  peälddan

+Der/Dimin:%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY%> N_PIISSUŽ ;  !!= * @CODE@  piâlduž
+Der/Dimin:%^XYY2XY%> N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: peäldaž

:%^XYY2XY A-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ; !!= * @CODE@ (10) peäld»
!! Sg_Loc_Px..

LEXICON N_TUÅIMM !!= * @CODE@ tuåimm:tuåimm
! 2.a.di.cluster
+N: NMN_TUÅIMM ;
LEXICON NMN_TUÅIMM
!! Sg_Nom: vow_di:vow_short:vow_low:pal_no:cns_vyy
! Sg_Nom: 1-Syll
! stem_vowel: a
! gradation: yes
! vowel: diphthong
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (vowel shift)
!! !!  Raised: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Lowered: ELSE
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel -u
!! !!1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Cluster alternation)
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Strong grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __N-tuaimm__
!NumContLex="1.1120000000000001"
!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: not-raised
:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		      	!!= * @CODE@ (3) tuoimmu
+Use/NG:%>u SG-ILL ;  !!= * @CODE@ tuåimmu
!! Sg_Ill

!! grade: strengthened (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
: A-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN ;	    	  !!= * @CODE@ (5) tuåimm
!! Ess_Px..., Sg_Ill..., N»A

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;			!!= * @CODE@ (1) tuåimm
: A-STEM_SG-NOM ;	    			!!= * @CODE@ (1) tuåimm
!! Sg_Nom, Sg_Nom..., Sg_Abe_Px1, Sg_Acc_Px1, Sg_Gen_Px1, Pl_Nom_Px1

!! grade: neutral (short_vowel, long_cluster), vowel: neutral (low), stem_vowel: a
:%>a ESS/PAR ;	   		    	!!= * @CODE@ (6) tuåimman

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^XYY2XY A-STEM_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) tuåim
!! Sg_Abe, Sg_Acc, Sg_Gen, Pl_Nom, +Use/NG_Sg_Loc_Px..., 
!! stem_vowel: a : Sg_Loc, Sg_Com, Pl_Gen, Pl_Acc, Pl_Ill, Pl_Loc, Pl_Com, Pl_Abe

!! grade: weakened (long_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: raised, stem_vowel: u/a
+Der/Dimin:%^VOWRaise%^XYY2XY N_PIISSUŽ ; !!= * @CODE@ (9) tuoimuž (2009: 312-313)
+Der/Dimin:%^XYY2XY%> N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: tuåimaž


!! grade: allegro (short_vowel, short_cluster), vowel: neutral (low)
:%^XYY2XY A-STEM-PX-ALLEGRO ;	  !!= * @CODE@ (5) tuåim
!! Sg_Loc_Px..


LEXICON N_MEER !!= * @CODE@ meer:meer
+N: NMN_MEER ;
LEXICON NMN_MEER
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_sing
! gradation: no
!! Is for nouns with ''-ast'' Loc, No gradation
!! N_A-U1-11
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! !!1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.2[] (Monophthong + Consonant)
!! !!  Weak grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Weak grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __meer, steehl__
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		!!= * @CODE@ meer
: SG-NOM ;	    		!!= * @CODE@ meer
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ meer
:%>u SG-ILL ;			!!= * @CODE@ meeru
+Use/NG:%>a SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ meera
:%>a SG-LOC ;	   		!!= * @CODE@ meerast
:%>a SG-COM_IN ;		!!= * @CODE@ meerain
:%>a ESS/PAR ;     			!!= * @CODE@ meeran
:%>a PL-OBL ;			!!= * @CODE@ meerai
+Der/Dimin: N_PIISSUŽ ;		!!= * @CODE@ meeruž
+Der/Dimin: N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: mẹẹraž

LEXICON N_VÄÄŽŽ !!= * @CODE@ vääžž:vääžž
+N: NMN_VÄÄŽŽ ;
LEXICON NMN_VÄÄŽŽ
!! Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_long:vow_low:pal_no:cns_gem_dd_type
! gradation: no
!! Is for nouns with ''-ast'' Loc, No gradation
!! N_A-U1-11
!! !!1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 180)
!! !!1.2 Sg.Loc in -ast (no vowel shift, all lowered)
!! !!  a-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
!! !!1.2.2 Sg.Ill vowel	-u
!! !!1.2.2.2 Lacks Palatalization
!! !!1.2.2.2.1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.2 Lacks Orthographic Gradation
!! !!1.2.2.2.1.2[] (Monophthong + Consonant)
!! !!  Weak grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
!! !!  Weak grade: Sg.Ill
!! !!  Weak grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
!! !!FORMS
!! ** Yaml: __A-vaeaezhzh__
 ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM ;		!!= * @CODE@ vääžž
: SG-NOM ;	    		!!= * @CODE@ vääžž
: SG-ABE/ACC/GEN-PL-NOM ;	!!= * @CODE@ vääžž
:%^VOWRaise%>u SG-ILL ;		!!= * @CODE@ vaažžu
+Use/NG:%>a SG-ILL ;  	      	!!= * @CODE@ vääžža
:%>a SG-LOC ;	   		!!= * @CODE@ vääžžast
:%>a SG-COM_IN ;		!!= * @CODE@ vääžžain
:%>a ESS/PAR ;     			!!= * @CODE@ vääžžan
:%>a PL-OBL ;			!!= * @CODE@ vääžžai
+Der/Dimin:%^VOWRaise N_PIISSUŽ ;	!!= * @CODE@ vaažžuž
+Der/Dimin: N_PẸẸSSAŽ ; !!= * @CODE@  (9) Dim.N.Sg.Nom: vääžžaž
+Use/NG+Der/Dimin: N_KUÂLAŽ ;   	!!= * @CODE@ vääžžaž
