src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N-INCOMING
aassâmtuåimm:aassâm#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
aazztemtuåimm:aazztem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
alggmeer:algg#mẹẹr N_MEER ;
ekonomiituåimm:ekonomii#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
jieʹllemvueʹǩǩtuåimm:jieʹllemvueʹǩǩ#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
joorrišuârmm:joorrišuârmm N_PEÄLDD ;
jävvpeäldd:jävvpeäldd N_PEÄLDD ;
jäällpeäldd:jäällpeäldd N_PEÄLDD ;
korallkuârgg:korallkuârgg N_PEÄLDD ;
kåttpeäldd:kåttpeäldd N_PEÄLDD ;
lââʹssvalmštemtuåimm:lââʹssvalmštem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
läähh:läähh N_VÄÄŽŽ ;
lääʹddmeer:lääʹdd#mẹẹr N_MEER ;
låʹǩǩ-kruâitt:låʹǩǩ-kruâitt N_PEÄLDD ;
meäʹccǩeâmpp:meäʹccǩeâmpp N_PEÄLDD ;
mäddkaaupšemtuåimm:mäddkaaupšem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
mäddtäälltuåimm:mäddtääll#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
mäddââʹnnemtuåimm:mäddââʹnnem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
nomadmeer:nomad#mẹẹr N_MEER ;
peälštemtuåimm:peälštem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
piõggsteehl:piõgˈg#stẹẹhl N_MEER ;
põõrǥâstuåimm:põõrǥâs#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
sosialtuåimm:sosial#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
suõjjeemtuåimm:suõjjeem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
sääʹm-meer:sääʹm-#mẹẹr N_MEER ;
sååbbarmeer:sååbbar#mẹẹr N_MEER ;
tattarpeäldd:tattarpeäldd N_PEÄLDD ;
tolltuåimm:toll#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
tuärjjeemtuåimm:tuärjjeem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
tuärrampeäldd:tuärrampeäldd N_PEÄLDD ;
tuåimm:tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
täälltuåimm:tääll#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
veäʹnccmeer:veäʹncc#mẹẹr N_MEER ;
veʹrǧǧneǩtuåimm:veʹrǧǧneǩ#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
vuõiggâdvuõtt-tuåimm:vuõiggâdvuõtt-#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
väinn-niâvv:väinn-#neävˈv N_NEÄVˈV-PL ;
võurrǩeâmpp:võurrǩeâmpp N_PEÄLDD ;
äiʹǧǧsteehl:äiʹǧǧ#steehl N_MEER ;
ämmatkuärgg:ämmatkuärgg N_PEÄLDD ;
õhttsažtuåimm:õhttsaž#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
čuõvtemtuåimm:čuõvtem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
čõõđtemtuåimm:čõõđtem#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
škooultuåimm:škooul#tuåimm N_TUÅIMM ;
šuuʹreemsteehl:šuuʹreem#stẹẹhl N_MEER ;
ǩeâlbb:ǩeâlbb N_PEÄLDD ;
ǩeâštt:ǩeâštt N_PEÄLDD ;
